Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-174
Defunct colleges; records; duties of registrar.

The office of registrar of the University of Nebraska is hereby designated the central depository for the records of such educational institutions in this state as have ceased to exist, or may cease to exist in the future. The registrar of the University of Nebraska shall, where possible, collect the records of such extinct educational institution, and have the supervision, care, custody and control of said records. The registrar of the University of Nebraska, having the records of such educational institutions, if any, shall, when requested, prepare transcripts of such grade records which may at any time become necessary to the former student for further scholastic work at other institutions, for certification for teaching and other professional positions. Whenever such transcript is made, and after it has been compared with the original, it shall be certified by the registrar of the University of Nebraska, and shall thereafter be considered and accepted as evidence and, for all other purposes, the same as the original could be. For the preparation of such transcript the registrar of the University of Nebraska may charge a nominal fee for services rendered.

Laws 1937, c. 179, § 2, p. 709;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-180;

R.S.1943, § 85-174.